Maryland, session 2026, HB1627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
4–302.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR HOWARD COUNTY SHALL HAVE ACCESS
TO AND MAY INSPECT A PUBLIC RECORD, AND A CUSTODIAN MAY NOT DENY ACCESS
TO A PUBLIC RECORD OR PART OF A PUBLIC RECORD, IF:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1627*

HOUSE BILL 1627
(1) A STATE OR LOCAL LAW AUTHORIZES THE OFFICE OF THE
INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR HOWARD COUNTY TO HAVE ACCESS TO AND INSPECT
THE PUBLIC RECORD; AND
(2) THE OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR HOWARD
COUNTY DETERMINES THAT ACCESS TO THE PUBLIC RECORD IS NECESSARY TO
PERFORM AN AUDIT OF:
(I) THE COUNTY GOVERNMENT;
(II) AN AGENCY OF THE COUNTY GOVERNMENT; OR
(III) THE COUNTY PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(B) ANY REDISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION CONTAINED IN A PUBLIC
RECORD THAT IS OBTAINED BY THE OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR
HOWARD COUNTY OR ANY EMPLOYEE OR AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE
OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR HOWARD COUNTY UNDER THIS SECTION
IS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.